District of Columbia statutes.
42-3405.03b

Choice of forum; standard of review.

(a)

The rights provided under §§ 42-3405.03 and 42-3405.03a are in the alternative. The party bringing the action may choose the forum and need not exhaust administrative remedies in order to bring an action under § 42-3405.03. Unless all parties to the action agree otherwise, once an action has been brought in one forum, an action based on the same or a substantially similar cause of action may not be brought in any other forum.

(b)

The applicability of this chapter, and rights created hereunder, shall be determined by examining the substance of the transaction or series of transactions. A step transaction or other device entered into or employed for the purpose of avoiding the obligation to comply with the requirements of this chapter shall be construed in accordance with the substance of the transaction.

History

Sept. 10, 1980, D.C. Law 3-86, § 503b
as added Sept. 6, 1995, D.C. Law 11-31, § 3(q), 42 DCR 3239
July 22, 2005, D.C. Law 16-15, § 2(e), 52 DCR 6885

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-1653.2.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-15, in the section heading, inserted “; standard of review”; designated the existing text as subsec. (a); and added subsec. (b).

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 3(p) of Rental Housing Conversion and Sale Act of 1980 Temporary Extension Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Law 10-176, September 22, 1994, law notification 41 DCR 6076).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of section, see § 3(q) of the Rental Housing Conversion and Sale Act of 1980 Reenactment and Amendment Emergency Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-285, July 8, 1994, 41 DCR 4904).
For temporary addition of section, see § 3(q) of the Rental Housing Conversion and Sale Act of 1980 Reenactment and Amendment Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-47, May 4, 1995, 42 DCR 2410) and § 3(q) of the Rental Housing Conversion and Sale Act of 1980 Reenactment and Amendment Congressional Recess Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-96, July 19, 1995, 42 DCR 3837).

Editor's Notes

Reenactment of D.C. Law 3-86: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3401.01.

Addition of § 45-1653.2 by Law 10-144: Section 2(q) of D.C. Law 10-144 purported to add a § 503b to D.C. Law 3-86 to be codified as § 42-3405.03b which read:

“The rights provided under §§ 45-1653 and 45-1653.1 are in the alternative. The party bringing the action may choose the forum and need not exhaust administrative remedies in order to bring an action under § 45-1653. Unless all parties to the action agree otherwise, once an action has been brought in 1 forum, an action based on the same or a substantially similar cause of action may not be brought in any other forum.”